New York, session 2025-2026, A5865.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5-b of section 396-i of the general business 2 law, as added by chapter 668 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 5-b. A gift certificate, other than [an open loop gift certificate or] 5 a promotional gift certificate, with a remaining value of less than 6 [five] ten dollars may be redeemed upon request for its cash value. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09659-02-5